en: Bruschetta breads
fr: Pains pour bruschetta

en: Crumpets
xx: Crumpets

en: English muffins
de: Englische Muffins
es: Muffins ingleses, Muffin inglés
fi: englantilaiset muffinit
fr: Pains Muffins, pain Muffins, pain Muffin, pains Muffin, pains pour Muffins, pain pour Muffins, pains pour Muffin, Muffin anglais
hr: Engleski muffini
ja: イングリッシュマフィン
lt: Angliškos bandelės
nl: Engelse muffins
zh: 英国松饼, 英式松饼

en: Whole-wheat English muffins, Whole wheat English muffins
fr: Muffins anglais au blé complet, Petit pains au blé complet

en: Hamburger buns, Burger buns, Rolls for hamburger, Buns for hamburger
ca: Pa d'hamburguesa
de: Hamburger-Brötchen, Burger-Brötchen
es: Panes para hamburguesas, Panes de hamburguesa
fi: hampurilaissämpylät
fr: Pains Burger, Pains pour hamburgers, pain pour hamburgers, Pain pour hamburger, Bun pour hamburger
hr: Peciva za hamburger
it: Pane da hamburger
ja: ハンバーガー用バンズ, ハンバーガーバンズ, バーガーバンズ
lt: Mėsainių bandelės, Bandelės mėsainiams
nl: Burgerbroodjes, Burgerbroodje
sv: Hamburgerbröd

en: Frozen hamburger buns
fr: Pains Burger surgelés, Pains pour hamburgers surgelés

en: Wholemeal rolls for hamburger, Wholemeal buns for hamburger
fr: Pain complet pour hamburger

en: Hot dog buns, Rolls for hotdog, Buns for hotdog, Rolls for hot dog, Buns for hot dog, Hot dog rolls
da: Pølsebrød
de: Hot-Dog-Brötchen
es: Panecillos para perritos calientes, Panecillo de perrito caliente, Panecillos para hot dogs
fi: Hot dog -sämpylät
fr: Pains Hot Dog, Pains Hot-dog, Pains Hot Dogs, Pains Hot-Dogs, Pain Hot-dog, Pain pour hotdog, Bun pour hotdog, Pain pour hot dog, Bun pour hot dog
hr: Hrenovke
it: Panini per hot dog
ja: ホットドッグ用パン, ホットドッグ用バンズ
lt: Dešrainių bandelės, Bandelės dešrainiams
nl: Hotdog-broodjes, Hot-dog broodje
pl: Bułki hot-dog, Bułki do hot-dogów
pt: Pães para hot dog, pãos para hot dog
sv: Korvbröd

en: Wholemeal hot dog buns, Wholemeal rolls for hotdog, Wholemeal buns for hotdog
da: Fuldkornspølsebrød
fr: Pain complet pour hot dog
sv: Fullkornskorvbröd

en: Sourdough hot dog buns
da: Surdejspølsebrød
sv: Surdegskorvbröd

en: Frozen hot dog buns
da: Frosne pølsebrød
sv: Frysta korvbröd

en: Gluten-free hot dog buns
da: Glutenfrie pølsebrød
sv: Glutenfria korvbröd

en: Frozen gluten-free hot dog buns
da: Frosne glutenfrie pølsebrød
sv: Frysta glutenfria korvbröd

en: Naans
xx: Naans, Naan
da: Naanbrød
fi: Naanit
fr: Naans, Nân
ja: ナン, ナーン
nl: Naanbroden, Naanbrood
pt: Pães naan
sv: Naanbröd

en: Pitas, Pittas, Pita bread, pitta bread
xx: Pitas, Pita
da: Pitabrød
es: Pitas, Pan pita, Panes pita
fi: Pitaleivät
fr: Pains Pita, Pains pitta, Pains pitas, pain pitas, pains pour pitas, pains pour pita, pain pour pitas, Pain pita
hr: Pitas, pita kruh
it: Pita
ja: ピタ, ピタパン
lt: Pitta duonos
nl: Pittabroden, Pittabrood, Pitta
pt: Pães pita
ru: Пита
sv: Pitabröd

en: Gluten-free pitas
da: Glutenfrie pitabrød
pt: Pães pita sem glúten
sv: Glutenfria pitabröd

en: Frozen pitas
da: Frosne pitabrød
pt: Pães pita congelados
sv: Frysta pitabröd

en: Frozen gluten-free pitas
da: Frosne glutenfrie pitabrød
pt: Pães pita congelados sem glúten
sv: Frysta glutenfria pitabröd

en: Frozen pre-baked pitas, frozen pre-baked Pita bread
da: Frosne forbagte pitabrød
fr: Pains Pita surgelé
pt: Pães pita pré-assados congelados
sv: Frysta förbakade pitabröd

en: Kebab breads
de: Kebab-Brot
fr: Pains kebab, pain kebab, pains kebabs, pains pour kebab, pain pour kebabs
hr: Kruhovi za ćevape
lt: Kebabų duonos, Duonos kebabams
nl: Kebab-broden, Kebab-brood